Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 49-1401 to 49-14,142 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 11;

Laws 1987, LB 480, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 815, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 28, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 399, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 581, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1021, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 34;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB464, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB527, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB322, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB626, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB85, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 51;

Laws 2026, LB904, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 44.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB904, section 1, with LB1075, section 44, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB904 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1075 became operative July 18, 2026.
The constitutionality of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act is generally irrelevant to a disciplinary proceeding. Ordinarily, a respondent has no standing to challenge the act. State ex rel. NSBA v. Douglas, 227 Neb. 1, 416 N.W.2d 515 (1987).